Utah statutes.
78B-6-513.   When title sought found defective -- Another action allowed.

If the title attempted to be acquired is found to be defective from any cause, the plaintiff may again institute proceedings to acquire the property as prescribed in this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

